Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
Article 5. Transferees and Creditors of Partner

Mineral interest held, following partner's death and partnership's termination, by successors in interest. —

It mattered not if the interest in a mineral interest was acquired by a party through the original land purchase as a partner or as a co-tenant. Whatever right was originally acquired was held, following the party's death, and the subsequent termination of the partnership, by the party's successors in interest as co-tenants. Simpson v. Kistler Inv. Co., 713 P.2d 751,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 455

(Wyo. 1986).

Ceasing of partner to be associated with partnership does not automatically dissolve it

without reference to “causes of dissolution” prescribed by § 17-13-603 (now

17-21-801

). Coady v. Batchelder, 79 Wyo. 447, 335 P.2d 443,

1959 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(Wyo. 1959).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

59A Am. Jur. 2d Partnership §§ 383 to 404.

Lease interest of individual as becoming partnership asset of firm subsequently formed, 37 ALR2d 1076.

Construction, application and effect of Uniform Partnership Act, relating to nonassignability of partner's right in specific partnership, 39 ALR2d 1365.

When real estate owned by partner before formation of partnership will be deemed to have become asset of firm, 45 ALR2d 1009.

Rights of surviving members and estate of deceased member of law firm in respect to business unfinished at time of latter's death, 78 ALR2d 280.

68 C.J.S. Partnership §§ 86 to 88, 224.

§ 17-21-501.
Partner's interest in partnership property not transferable.

A partner is not a co-owner of partnership property and has no interest that can be transferred, either voluntarily or involuntarily, in partnership property.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 194, § 1.

§ 17-21-502.
Partner's transferable interest in partnership.

The only transferable interest of a partner in the partnership is the partner’s interest in distributions. The interest is personal property.

A transferee of a partner’s transferable interest in the partnership has the right to cause a winding up of the partnership business as provided in W.S. 17-21-801(a)(vi).

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 194, § 1.

Partnership property sold at foreclosure sale. —

When property which is held in a partnership's name is sold at a foreclosure sale, the partnership, not an individual partner, is the “person whose real estate has been sold.” Under the plain language of §

1-18-104

, only a judgment creditor of the partnership can redeem the property. Christensen v. Oedekoven, 888 P.2d 228,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 1995).

§ 17-21-503.
Transfer of partner's transferable interest.

A transfer, in whole or in part, of a partner’s transferable interest in the partnership:

Is permissible;

Does not by itself cause a winding up of the partnership business; and

Does not, as against the other partners or the partnership, entitle the transferee, during the continuance of the partnership, to participate in the management or conduct of the partnership business, to require access to information concerning or an account of partnership transactions or to inspect or copy the partnership books or records.

A transferee of a partner’s transferable interest in the partnership is entitled to receive, in accordance with the transfer, distributions to which the transferor would otherwise be entitled. Upon transfer, the transferor retains the rights and duties of a partner other than the interest in distributions transferred.

If an event causes a dissolution and winding up of the partnership business under W.S.

17-21-801

, a transferee is entitled to receive, in accordance with the transfer, the net amount otherwise distributable to the transferor. In a dissolution and winding up, a transferee may require an accounting only from the date of the last account agreed to by all of the partners.

Until receipt of notice of a transfer, a partnership has no duty to give effect to the transferee’s rights under this section.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 194, § 1.

Partnership property sold at foreclosure sale. —

When property which is held in a partnership's name is sold at a foreclosure sale, the partnership, not an individual partner, is the “person whose real estate has been sold.” Under the plain language of §

1-18-104

, only a judgment creditor of the partnership can redeem the property. Christensen v. Oedekoven, 888 P.2d 228,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 1995).

§ 17-21-504.
Partner's transferable interest subject to charging order.

On application by a judgment creditor of a partner or partner’s transferee, a court having jurisdiction may charge the transferable interest of the debtor partner or transferee to satisfy the judgment. The court may appoint a receiver of the debtor’s share of the distributions due or to become due to the debtor in respect of the partnership and make all other orders, directions, accounts and inquiries the debtor might have made or which the circumstances of the case may require.

A charging order constitutes a lien on the judgment debtor’s transferable interest in the partnership. The court may order a foreclosure of the interest subject to the charging order at any time and upon conditions it considers appropriate. The purchaser at the foreclosure sale has the rights of a transferee.

At any time before foreclosure, an interest charged may be redeemed:

By the judgment debtor;

With property other than partnership property by one (1) or more of the other partners; or

With partnership property by one (1) or more of the other partners with the consent of all the partners whose interests are not so charged.

This chapter does not deprive a partner of a right under exemption laws with respect to the partner’s interest in the partnership.

This section provides the exclusive remedy by which a judgment creditor of a partner or partner’s transferee may satisfy a judgment out of the judgment debtor’s transferable interest in the partnership.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 194, § 1.

Enforcement of judgment. —

Once the February 2006 judgment became final, wife had the legal right to proceed with enforcement of that judgment; under the circumstances, district court had discretion to determine the manner in which to enforce the judgment, including discretion to order husband to pay the unsatisfied judgment in cash.
Burnett v. Steeley, 2008 WY 94, 190 P.3d 132,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 98

(Wyo. 2008).

Procedure protects nondebtor partners' interests. —

Charging orders are remedies different in character from writs of garnishment. The charging order procedure protects the interests of the nondebtor partners by giving the judge wide latitude to control the creditor's actions against the partnership. Christensen v. Oedekoven, 888 P.2d 228,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 1995).